New York, session 2025-2026, A7362.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 319 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 319. Student mental wellness training. 1. Every employee of each 4 elementary, intermediate, middle, junior high and senior high school 5 within the state shall complete student mental wellness training each 6 year. 7 2. The commissioner in consultation with the department of mental 8 hygiene, the office of addiction services and supports, and the depart- 9 ment of health, shall develop the annual student mental wellness train- 10 ing and any course materials to be offered as part of such training 11 pursuant to subdivision one of this section. Such training shall 12 include, but not be limited to: 13 (a) identifying signs and symptoms of mental health issues, eating 14 disorders, behavioral health disorders, and substance use disorders. 15 (b) the use of evidence-based training programs including, but not 16 limited to, mental health first aid or core elements of such programs to 17 the extent practicable. 18 (c) safe de-escalation of crisis situations. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 20 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 21 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 22 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 23 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04576-01-5